tests/feature/test-conflicting-tags.lexd
PATTERNS
Verbs-IV

PATTERN VerbStemBase
V-IV [<v><iv>:>[nonpunct]] V-Aspect-Hab
V-IV [<v><iv>:>[punct]] V-Aspect-Punct   # error reported here

PATTERN VerbStem
VerbStemBase[^[A1,A2]]

PATTERN Verbs-IV
:V-Agent VerbStem[-nonpunct] V-Agent:
:V-Agent VerbStem[stat] V-Agent:

LEXICON V-IV
stem

LEXICON V-Aspect-Hab
<hab>:{a}haʔ[A1]
<hab>:{a}s[A2]

LEXICON V-Aspect-Punct
<punct>:{a}{ʔ}[A1]
<punct>:{a}{ʔ}[A2]

LEXICON V-Agent
<a1sg>:{G}{e}
<a1duexcl>:{y}ag{n}{I}
